Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.983] ACCEPTANCE OF CASH REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Cash" means the physical currency of the United States, whether paper money or coins. new text end new text begin (c) "Retail establishment" means a place of business open to the general public for the sale of goods or services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirement. new text end new text begin A retail establishment is required to accept cash from consumers as payment for goods or services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to sales of goods and services on or after that date. new text end